Hawaii statutes.
[§305J-16] Reciprocity. The director may enter into any post-secondary education authorization
reciprocity agreement; provided that the authorization standards of the
reciprocity agreement shall be comparable to or exceed
the authorization requirements of this chapter and any applicable
administrative rules. [L 2013, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next